Illinois, session 104th, HB1581.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 1. Short title. This Act may be cited as the 5Adequate and Equitable Public University Funding Act. 6    Section 5. Findings. The General Assembly makes all of the 7following findings:8        (1) A thriving postsecondary education system enriches 9    the State and its residents.10        (2) Illinois requires an adequate, equitable, and 11    stable approach to funding public universities.12        (3) Historic inequities in university funding underlie 13    current gaps in access, retention, and attainment among 14    different groups of students in this State.15        (4) The State must seek to reduce on behalf of 16    underserved students the significant disparities in public 17    university access, affordability, and measures of 18    retention, progress, and degree completion, by, among 19    other things, addressing the influence of disparities in 20    resources by race, income, age of entry, and location.21        (5) High-quality, evidence-based student support has 22    been shown to improve enrollment and outcomes for 23    students.  HB1581- 2 -LRB104 08166 LNS 18214 b1        (6) Illinois' public universities have a variety of 2    missions and characteristics.3        (7) Through "A Thriving Illinois: Higher Education 4    Paths to Equity, Sustainability, and Growth", the State 5    has set systemwide goals for equity, sustainability, and 6    growth, and the General Assembly must strategically fund 7    public universities to achieve these goals.8        (8) As State funding has decreased, Illinois' public 9    universities have become increasingly reliant on tuition 10    and fees, increasing the debt students take on to fund 11    their education.12        (9) Public universities should be funded to 13    sufficiently achieve student, institutional, and State 14    goals.15        (10) Public higher education should be affordable for 16    all students.17        (11) Increasing public funding for public universities 18    should be paired with increased transparency and 19    accountability. 20    Section 10. Purpose. It is the purpose of this Act to 21establish an adequate and equitable funding formula for public 22universities that shall do all of the following:23        (1) ensure that the State provides adequate, 24    equitable, and stable funding for public universities that 25    is particularly directed to serving students from groups   HB1581- 3 -LRB104 08166 LNS 18214 b1    for whom there is evidence of meaningful gaps in 2    enrollment, retention, and completion compared to their 3    peers;4        (2) determine, for each eligible public institution, a 5    funding level based on the unique needs and of the 6    eligible public institution's student body and the 7    eligible public institution's mission and mix of programs;8        (3) encourage greater access and success for students 9    who are, based on evidence, less likely to enroll, 10    persist, progress, and complete their selected programs of 11    study; and12        (4) provide a funding increase to each eligible public 13    institution when new funds are invested;14        (5) support the diverse missions of each eligible 15    public institution;16        (6) foster economic activity and innovation;17        (7) ensure that each eligible public institution has 18    the flexibility to invest in ways that best serve the 19    eligible public institution's students;20        (8) allow for ongoing monitoring and continuous 21    improvement of the adequate and equitable funding formula 22    for eligible public institutions;23        (9) incentivize each eligible public institution to 24    reduce reliance on student tuition and fees with increased 25    State investment;26        (10) distribute new funding through an equitable   HB1581- 4 -LRB104 08166 LNS 18214 b1    allocation that drives resources to eligible public 2    institution that are furthest from adequate funding; and3        (11) ensure that each eligible public institution is 4    held harmless in the transition to a new funding model. 5    Section 15. Definitions. In this Act:6    "Academic and nonacademic support" means a per-student 7funding amount required to cover costs related to providing 8high-impact support for student retention and completion. 9"Academic and nonacademic support" includes, among other 10things, academic support for curriculum design, academic 11advising, career services, and tutoring, as well as 12nonacademic support for single stop centers, emergency aid, 13student mental health support, and services related to 14housing, transportation, and child care.15    "Access adjustment" means an adjustment to access support 16for the increased costs of closing enrollment gaps for 17underserved students.18    "Access support" means a per-student funding amount 19required to cover costs related to outreach, recruitment, and 20enrollment of students, including admissions and financial aid 21offices.22    "Adequacy components" means the components of an adequate 23education, including the components necessary to provide 24instruction and student services, to advance the eligible 25public institution's research and public service mission, and   HB1581- 5 -LRB104 08166 LNS 18214 b1to cover its operations and maintenance needs.2    "Adequacy gap" means the funding gap between the adequacy 3target of an eligible public institution and the resource 4profile of that eligible public institution.5    "Adequacy gap formula" means a formula for distributing 6funds among eligible public institutions based on an eligible 7public institution's adequacy gap, as calculated on a 8percentage basis.9    "Adequacy target" means the amount of funding a particular 10eligible public institution needs to cover the expenses of 11instruction and student services, the eligible public 12institution's research and public service mission, operations 13and maintenance associated with the student population the 14eligible public institution serves, and the eligible public 15institution's institutional characteristics, as well as to 16support closing gaps in enrollment, retention, or completion 17for underserved students.18    "Adult student" means a student who is 25 years old or 19older.20    "Affordability" means the total expense of attendance that 21a student can reasonably be expected to pay given the 22student's means.23    "Annual formula funding" means the sum of the following 24State appropriations for the fiscal year: the base funding 25minimum appropriated for each eligible public institution for 26the fiscal year, plus all new State formula funding   HB1581- 6 -LRB104 08166 LNS 18214 b1appropriated for the fiscal year. 2    "Base funding minimum" means the minimum funding amount 3each year per eligible public institution to which new State 4formula funding is added, as calculated in subsection (b) of 5Section 35.6    "Board" means the Board of Higher Education.7    "Carnegie Classification system" means the 2021 version of 8the basic classification system developed and maintained by 9the American Council on Education, which classifies higher 10education institutions based on their level of degrees awarded 11and level of research activity.12    "Concentration factor adjustment" means an adjustment to 13academic and nonacademic support based on the percentage of 14all undergraduate students who meet the requirements for a 15high and intensive holistic support equity adjustment.16    "Core funding" means a per-student funding amount 17determined to be necessary to provide the following types of 18support before any adjustments are made:19        (1) access support;20        (2) academic and nonacademic support; 21        (3) core instructional program support; 22        (4) research support; 23        (5) public service and artistry support; 24        (6) institutional support; and 25        (7) physical plant support.26    "Core instructional program adjustment" means an   HB1581- 7 -LRB104 08166 LNS 18214 b1adjustment to core instructional program support to cover the 2increased costs of high-cost programs, health professional 3programs, and medical programs.4    "Core instructional program support" means a per-student 5funding amount required to cover costs related to delivering 6instructional programs.7    "Cumulative statewide adequacy gap percentage" means the 8sum of all eligible public institution adequacy gap 9percentages.10    "Distribution formula" means the formula for calculating 11funding amounts to be allocated across eligible public 12institutions, as set forth in Section 35.13    "Diversity programs adjustment" means an adjustment to 14core instructional program support for underrepresented 15students enrolled in high-cost programs, health professional 16programs, and medical programs, including undergraduate, 17graduate, or professional studies.18    "Dollar gap formula" means a formula for distributing 19funds among eligible public institutions based on an eligible 20public institution's adequacy gap in absolute dollars. 21    "Eligible public institution" means each of the following 22public institutions of higher education: Chicago State 23University, Eastern Illinois University, Governors State 24University, Illinois State University, Northeastern Illinois 25University, Northern Illinois University, Southern Illinois 26University at Carbondale, Southern Illinois School of   HB1581- 8 -LRB104 08166 LNS 18214 b1Medicine; Southern Illinois University at Edwardsville, the 2University of Illinois at Chicago, the University of Illinois 3at Chicago School of Medicine, the University of Illinois at 4Springfield, the University of Illinois at Urbana-Champaign, 5the University of Illinois at Urbana-Champaign College of 6Medicine, Western Illinois University, or any other public 7college or university now or hereafter established or 8authorized by the General Assembly and deemed to be eligible 9for funding through the Adequate and Equitable Funding Formula 10by the Board of Higher Education, except a community college.11    "Eligible public institution adequacy gap percentage" 12means the ratio of an eligible public institution's adequacy 13gap and its adequacy target.14    "Equitable student share" means the amount an eligible 15public institution should be expected to contribute toward its 16adequacy target that can be reasonably generated by student 17tuition and fees, based on the characteristics of its student 18body, as determined under Section 30. The equitable student 19share of an eligible public institution is a hypothetical 20calculation made for the express purpose of differentiating 21which portion of a particular eligible public institution's 22adequacy target costs should be covered by State 23appropriations rather than student tuition and fee payments. 24The use of the equitable student share calculation after the 25effective date of this Act shall shift responsibility to cover 26more of the cost of funding the adequacy target of a particular   HB1581- 9 -LRB104 08166 LNS 18214 b1eligible public institution to be borne by State 2appropriations, rather than student tuition and fee payments, 3making higher education attendance more affordable for all 4students who attend the eligible public institution.5    "Funding formula" means the adequate and equitable funding 6formula for public universities created under this Act.7    "Funding Formula Review Panel" means the panel established 8under Section 45.9    "Head count" means the rolling 3-year average of the 10unduplicated number of degree-seeking students enrolled in an 11eligible public institution. 12    "Health professional program adjustment" means an 13adjustment to core instructional program support calculated by 14the Board, based on cost modeling research, to cover the 15increased costs of offering master's and doctoral degree 16programs in the following disciplines: veterinary medicine, 17dentistry, pharmacy, physical therapy, and audiology and 18speech pathology.19    "High-cost program adjustment" means an adjustment to core 20instructional program support calculated by the Board, based 21on cost modeling research, to cover the higher costs of 22offering certain programs, including, but not limited to, 23engineering, fine arts, and registered nursing. These programs 24shall be identified based on consistently higher than average 25costs relative to other programs at the same level across 26multiple institutions, time periods, and states.   HB1581- 10 -LRB104 08166 LNS 18214 b1    "Holistic support equity adjustment" means an adjustment 2to academic and nonacademic support for the increased costs of 3closing retention gaps for underserved students.4    "Institutional support" means a per-student funding amount 5required to cover costs related to the basic administration of 6an eligible public institution, such as central 7administration, business, office, and human resource costs.8    "Laboratory space adjustment" means an adjustment to 9physical plant support based on the cost of maintaining 10laboratory space.11    "Medical program adjustment" means an adjustment to core 12instructional program support calculated by the Board, based 13on cost modeling research, to cover the increased costs of 14offering medical degree programs.15    "New State formula funding" means, for a given fiscal 16year, all State funds appropriated for the adequate and 17equitable funding formula for public universities in excess of 18the amount provided in the previous fiscal year.19    "Other resources" means a percentage of an eligible public 20institution's endowment that it may be expected to spend 21without depleting its endowment. "Other resources" does not 22include grants and contracts.23    "Percentage gap" means the size of an eligible public 24institution's adequacy gap measured by dividing its resource 25profile by its adequacy target.26    "Physical plant support" means a per-student funding   HB1581- 11 -LRB104 08166 LNS 18214 b1amount required to cover costs related to the operation and 2maintenance of a physical campus of an eligible public 3institution, including, but not limited to, custodial 4services, snow removal, painting, and repairs.5    "Public service and artistry support" means a per-student 6funding amount required to cover costs related to public 7service and artistry.8    "Public university" means the University of Illinois, 9Southern Illinois University, Chicago State University, 10Eastern Illinois University, Governors State University, 11Illinois State University, Northeastern Illinois University, 12Northern Illinois University, Western Illinois University, or 13any other public college or university now or hereafter 14established or authorized by the General Assembly, except a 15community college.16    "Research support" means a per-student funding amount 17required to cover costs related to research.18    "Resource profile" means the resources available to a 19public university to cover the costs of the adequacy target.20    "Scaled institutional ratio cut" means the calculation 21used to apply the reduction ratio to the amount of the funding 22reduction in a given fiscal year. To calculate the scaled 23institutional ratio cut, each eligible public institution's 24percentage reduction ratio shall be proportionally scaled up 25or down based on the total amount of reduced appropriations.26    "School size adjustment" means an adjustment to   HB1581- 12 -LRB104 08166 LNS 18214 b1institutional support for an eligible public institution with 2a head count of less than 20,000 students.3    "Statewide adequacy gap" means the difference between (i) 4the cumulative total of each eligible public institution's 5adequacy targets and (ii) the cumulative total of each 6eligible public institution's resource profile.7    "Statewide gap" means the statewide funding gap determined 8by dividing the adequacy target of all eligible public 9institutions by the resource profile of all eligible public 10institutions, measured as a percentage.11    "Underserved students" means students or student groups 12that have gaps in enrollment, retention, or completion between 13their population and a relevant comparison group based on data 14available to the State. The Board shall determine which 15students or student groups meet this term through a 16data-informed determination of "underserved students" that 17shall be updated every 3 years. The Board shall consider data 18about postsecondary enrollment patterns, student demographics, 19student and family income levels, student outcomes, and 20geographic distribution when developing its determination. 21    Section 20. Adequate and equitable funding formula for 22public universities.23    (a) After the effective date of this Act, all general 24operating expenses for public universities shall be 25distributed by the Board through the funding formula created   HB1581- 13 -LRB104 08166 LNS 18214 b1under this Act for public universities and shall be 2administered by the Board. 3    (b) The adequate and equitable funding formula for public 4universities shall include all of the following: 5        (1) an adequacy target for each eligible public 6    institution, as calculated in Section 25; 7        (2) a resource profile for each eligible public 8    institution, as calculated in Section 30; and9        (3) an adequacy gap for each eligible public 10    institution, which is the difference between the adequacy 11    target and the resource profile.12    (c) The funding formula shall operate as follows:13        (1) The General Assembly shall appropriate new funding 14    to reduce the statewide adequacy gap.15            (A) The Board shall use the formula in Section 25 16        to calculate the adequacy target for each eligible 17        public institution.18            (B) The Board shall use the formula in Section 30 19        to calculate the resource profile for each eligible 20        public institution.21            (C) After calculating the adequacy target and 22        resource profile for each eligible public institution, 23        the Board shall subtract the resource profile from the 24        adequacy target to determine the adequacy gap for each 25        eligible public institution.26        (2) The Board shall use the distribution formula set   HB1581- 14 -LRB104 08166 LNS 18214 b1    forth in Section 35 to calculate the amount of the new 2    funding to allocate for each eligible public institution.3            (A) Unless the Board determines an eligible public 4        institution to be ineligible for new funding after 5        considering recommendations of the Accountability and 6        Transparency Committee, each eligible public 7        institution is eligible for new funding.8            (B) The Board shall outline what conditions, if 9        any, come with the new funding.10        (3) The Board shall distribute new funding to each 11    public university through the distribution formula set 12    forth in Section 35. 13    Section 25. Adequacy target.14    (a) As used in this Section, "underrepresented students" 15means student groups whose share of the head count of the 16relevant core instructional program across all eligible public 17institutions is less than the share of that same student group 18across every eligible public institution's undergraduate head 19count.20    (b) The adequacy target for each eligible public 21institution is the sum of the eligible public institution's 22cost of providing an equitable and adequate education based on 23the specific characteristics of the eligible public 24institution and the eligible public institution's student body 25as calculated in accordance with this Section each fiscal   HB1581- 15 -LRB104 08166 LNS 18214 b1year. Each eligible public institution's adequacy target shall 2be made up of the following adequacy components:3        (1) an instruction and student services component, 4    which shall cover the expenses of providing access 5    support, academic and nonacademic support, and core 6    instructional program support;7        (2) a research and public service mission component, 8    which shall cover the expenses of providing mission 9    support and public service and artistry support; and10        (3) an operations and maintenance component, which 11    shall cover the expenses of institutional support and 12    physical plant support.13    (c) The adequacy components shall be predicated on a base, 14per-student, core funding amount and, if necessary, 15accompanying adjustments, each of which has been identified as 16evidence-based or as needed to enhance, based on the available 17data, the enrollment and graduation of underserved students, 18and shall be evaluated and adjusted under subsection (g) of 19Section 45. In Fiscal Year 2026 and in each fiscal year 20thereafter, the dollar value of each of the core funding 21elements and any adjustment represented by a dollar value 22identified in this Section shall be increased annually, on a 23cumulative basis, predicated on the Employment Cost Index 24(Midwest Economy) published by the Bureau of Labor Statistics 25of the United States Department of Labor for the 4-quarter 26period ending on December 31 of the immediately preceding   HB1581- 16 -LRB104 08166 LNS 18214 b1fiscal year. The adequacy target of an eligible public 2institution in a fiscal year shall be the sum of its adequacy 3components for the fiscal year, adjusted for inflation as 4provided in this subsection (c).5    (d) The instruction and student services adequacy 6component shall be determined as follows:7        (1) The Board shall include in each eligible public 8    institution's adequacy target the costs required to 9    provide students with access support as follows:10            (A) The Board shall include access support in the 11        amount of $1,136 per student in each eligible public 12        institution's adequacy target. 13            (B) The access adjustments to the access support 14        shall be determined as follows:15                (i) the Board shall include in each eligible 16            public institution's adequacy target an additional 17            $500 for each undergraduate student included in 18            the eligible public institution's head count who 19            meets the requirements for a low-access adjustment 20            as defined in subsection (g); and21                (ii) the Board shall include in each eligible 22            public institution's adequacy target an additional 23            $1,000 for each undergraduate student included in 24            the eligible public institution's head count who 25            meets the requirements for a medium-access 26            adjustment as defined in subsection (g).  HB1581- 17 -LRB104 08166 LNS 18214 b1        (2) The Board shall include in each eligible public 2    institution's adequacy target the funding required to 3    provide students with academic and nonacademic support as 4    follows: 5            (A) The Board shall include academic and 6        nonacademic support in the amount of $2,196 per 7        student in each eligible public institution's adequacy 8        target.9            (B) The holistic support equity adjustment to the 10        academic and nonacademic support shall be determined 11        as follows:12                (i) The Board shall include in each eligible 13            public institution's adequacy target an additional 14            $2,000 for each student included in the eligible 15            public institution's head count who meets the 16            requirements for a low holistic support equity 17            adjustment as defined in subsection (h).18                (ii) The Board shall include in each eligible 19            public institution's adequacy target an additional 20            $4,000 for each student included in the eligible 21            public institution's head count who meets the 22            requirements for a medium holistic support equity 23            adjustment as defined in subsection (h).24                (iii) The Board shall include in each eligible 25            public institution's adequacy target an additional 26            $6,000 for each student included in the eligible   HB1581- 18 -LRB104 08166 LNS 18214 b1            public institution's head count who meets the 2            requirements for a high holistic support equity 3            adjustment as defined in subsection (h).4                (iv) The Board shall include in each eligible 5            public institution's adequacy target an additional 6            $8,000 for each student included in the eligible 7            public institution's head count who meets the 8            requirements for an intensive holistic support 9            equity adjustment as defined in subsection (h). 10            (C) The concentration factor adjustment to 11        academic and nonacademic support shall be determined 12        as follows:13                (i) If 75% or more of the undergraduate 14            students included in an eligible public 15            institution's head count meet the requirements for 16            a high holistic support equity adjustment or an 17            intensive holistic support equity adjustment, then 18            each of the holistic support equity adjustment 19            amounts described in subparagraph (B) of paragraph 20            (2) of this subsection (d) shall be increased by a 21            concentration factor of 50%.22                (ii) If 60% or more but less than 75% of the 23            undergraduate students included in an eligible 24            public institution's head count meet the 25            requirements for a high holistic support equity 26            adjustment or an intensive holistic support equity   HB1581- 19 -LRB104 08166 LNS 18214 b1            adjustment, then each of the holistic support 2            equity adjustment amounts described in 3            subparagraph (B) of paragraph (2) of this 4            subsection (d) shall be increased by a 5            concentration factor of 30%.6                (iii) If 50% or more but less than 60% of the 7            undergraduate students included in an eligible 8            public institution's head count meet the 9            requirements for a high holistic support equity 10            adjustment or an intensive holistic support equity 11            adjustment, then each of the holistic support 12            equity adjustment amounts described in 13            subparagraph (B) of paragraph (2) of this 14            subsection (d) shall be increased by a 15            concentration factor of 10%. 16                (iv) If less than 50% of the undergraduate 17            students included in an eligible public 18            institution's head count meet the requirements for 19            a high holistic support equity adjustment or an 20            intensive holistic support equity adjustment, then 21            no concentration factor may be applied to the 22            eligible public institution's holistic support 23            equity adjustments.24        (3) The Board shall include in each eligible public 25    institution's adequacy target the funding required to 26    provide students with core instructional program support   HB1581- 20 -LRB104 08166 LNS 18214 b1    as follows: 2            (A) The Board shall include core instructional 3        program support in the amount of $9,797 per student in 4        each eligible public institution's adequacy target.5            (B) For Fiscal Year 2026 and Fiscal Year 2027, the 6        high-cost and high-priority programs to be included in 7        the adjustment are as follows:8                (i) Engineering (all Classification of 9            Instructional Programs (CIP) codes 14.XXXX).10                (ii) Fine arts (all CIP codes 50.XXXX).11                (iii) Registered nursing (CIP code 51.38XX).12                (iv) Other health professional programs (CIP 13            codes 01.8001, 51.0201, 51.0202, 51.0204, 51.0401, 14            51.2001, 51.2308, and 51.3818).15            (C) The core instructional program adjustment to 16        core instructional program support shall be determined 17        as follows:18                (i) For students participating in a high-cost 19            program at the eligible public institution, the 20            dollar amount of the core instructional program 21            support shall be increased by 20%.22                (ii) For students participating in a health 23            professional program at the eligible public 24            institution, the dollar amount of core 25            instructional program support shall be increased 26            by 100%.  HB1581- 21 -LRB104 08166 LNS 18214 b1                (iii) For students participating in a medical 2            program at the eligible public institution, the 3            dollar amount of core instructional program 4            support shall be increased by 1,100%.5            (D) The diversity programs adjustment shall be 6        calculated using each eligible public institution's 7        head count of underrepresented students in core 8        instructional programs. The diversity programs 9        adjustments shall be determined as follows:10                (i) For each underrepresented student enrolled 11            in a high-cost program at the eligible public 12            institution, the high-cost program adjustment 13            shall be increased by 45%. 14                (ii) For each underrepresented student 15            enrolled in a health professional program at the 16            eligible public institution, the health 17            professional program adjustment shall be increased 18            by 69%.19                (iii) For each underrepresented student 20            enrolled in a medical program at the eligible 21            public institution the medical program adjustment 22            shall be increased by 18%.23    (e) The research and public service mission adequacy 24component shall be determined as follows:25        (1) The Board shall include in each eligible public 26    institution's adequacy target the funding required to   HB1581- 22 -LRB104 08166 LNS 18214 b1    conduct research as follows:2            (A) The Board shall include research support in 3        the amount of $600 per student in each eligible public 4        institution's adequacy target.5            (B) For the head count of an eligible public 6        institution, a research support adjustment shall be 7        applied to the research support provided for each 8        student. The research support adjustment shall be 9        determined as follows:10                (i) the Board shall include in an eligible 11            public institution's adequacy target an additional 12            $500 for each enrolled student if the eligible 13            public institution is under the category of D/PU: 14            Doctoral/Professional Universities under the 15            Carnegie Classification system;16                (ii) the Board shall include in an eligible 17            public institution's adequacy target an additional 18            $700 for each enrolled student if the eligible 19            public institution is under the category of R2: 20            Doctoral Universities - High research activity 21            under the Carnegie Classification system; or22                (iii) the Board shall include in an eligible 23            public institution's adequacy target an additional 24            $1,200 for each enrolled student if the eligible 25            public institution is under the category of R1: 26            Doctoral Universities - Very high research   HB1581- 23 -LRB104 08166 LNS 18214 b1            activity under the Carnegie Classification system.2        (2) The Board shall include in each eligible public 3    institution's adequacy target the funding required to 4    promote public service and artistry. For the head count of 5    an eligible public institution, the eligible public 6    institution shall include public service and artistry 7    support in the amount of $200 per student in its adequacy 8    target.9    (f) The operations and maintenance adequacy component 10shall be determined as follows:11        (1) The Board shall include in each eligible public 12    institution's adequacy target the funding required to 13    provide institutional support as follows:14            (A) The Board shall include institutional support 15        in the amount of $1,941 per student in each eligible 16        public institution's adequacy target.17            (B) The school size adjustment shall be applied to 18        any eligible public institution with a head count of 19        less than 20,000 students. The school size adjustment 20        shall be calculated by subtracting the eligible public 21        institution's head count from 20,000, dividing the 22        result by 20,000, then multiplying that quotient by 23        45%. The resulting percentage shall be multiplied by 24        the institutional support for each eligible public 25        institution to get the per-student subsidy amount. 26        That amount shall then be multiplied by the head count   HB1581- 24 -LRB104 08166 LNS 18214 b1        and the resulting amount shall be included in the 2        eligible public institution's adequacy target.3        (2) The Board shall include in each eligible public 4    institution's adequacy target the funding required to 5    maintain the eligible public institution's physical plant 6    as follows:7            (A) Each eligible public institution shall include 8        physical plant support in the amount of $7.78 per 9        square foot in its adequacy target.10            (B) Each eligible public institution shall include 11        in its adequacy target a laboratory space adjustment 12        cost of $1.54 per square foot of laboratory space in 13        the eligible public institution's physical plant.14    (g) As used in this subsection (g):15    "Low-access adjustment" means an adjustment for an 16eligible public institution having a disparity that is greater 17than or equal to 1% but less than 10% in statewide public 18university enrollment rates for any subgroup of students 19compared to the statewide average of all other students.20    "Medium-access adjustment" means an adjustment for an 21eligible public institution having a 10% or greater disparity 22in statewide public university enrollment rates for any 23subgroup of students compared to the statewide average of all 24other students.25    Eligibility for the access adjustments shall be determined 26using the gaps in the percentage of statewide public   HB1581- 25 -LRB104 08166 LNS 18214 b1university enrollment of recent high school graduates for any 2subgroup of students compared to the statewide average of all 3other students, as determined by the Board. The access 4adjustments shall be allocated based on the head count of 5undergraduate students at each eligible public institution and 6shall be categorized as either low-access adjustments or 7medium-access adjustments, with student populations with 8larger enrollment gaps having higher adjustment amounts. 9Students with multiple characteristics shall be placed in the 10category associated with their highest characteristic.11    (h) As used in this subsection (h): 12    "High holistic support adjustment" means an adjustment for 13an eligible public institution having greater than or equal to 1411% disparity in retention rates for any subgroup of students 15compared to the statewide average of all other students.16    "Intensive holistic support adjustment" means an 17adjustment for an eligible public institution having students 18belonging to 2 other categories of holistic support, one of 19which is high holistic support.20    "Low holistic support adjustment" means an adjustment for 21an eligible public institution having a disparity in retention 22rates greater than or equal to 1% but less than 6% for any 23subgroup of students compared to the statewide average of all 24other students.25    "Medium holistic support adjustment" means an adjustment 26for an eligible public institution having a disparity in   HB1581- 26 -LRB104 08166 LNS 18214 b1retention rates greater than or equal to 6% but less than 11% 2for any subgroup of students compared to the statewide average 3of all other students.4    The academic and nonacademic support adjustments shall be 5determined using the statewide gaps in the percentage of 6year-over-year retention for any subgroup of students compared 7to the statewide average of all other students, as determined 8by the Board. The holistic support equity adjustments shall be 9categorized, in descending order, as intensive, high, medium, 10or low, with students with multiple characteristics being 11placed one category above the category associated with their 12highest characteristic. Undergraduate students are eligible 13for all holistic support equity adjustments. Graduate students 14are eligible for the high and medium holistic support equity 15adjustments. 16    (i) The adequacy target does not include, among other 17expenditures, any of the following:18        (1) expenditures for hospitals, athletics, 19    auxiliaries, housing, health insurance, or deferred 20    maintenance; or21        (2) institutional financial aid.22    (j) The Board, in consultation with the Funding Formula 23Review Panel, may, by rule, define additional academic and 24nonacademic support and additional high-cost programs. The 25Board, in consultation with the Funding Formula Review Panel, 26may also define by rule the maximum adjustment and number of   HB1581- 27 -LRB104 08166 LNS 18214 b1students who are eligible for the school size adjustment. 2    Section 30. Resource profile.3    (a) As used in this Section:4    "Deemed State appropriation percentage" means that portion 5of an eligible public institution's core funding that State 6appropriations are deemed responsible to cover, predicated on 7a weighted average of the following apportionments of the core 8funding, using the head count at the eligible public 9institution of the following students, provided that the 10apportionments set forth within each paragraph are cumulative 11so that if a student is associated with more than one 12apportionment criterion, the multiple apportionments shall be 13added together:14        (1) 30% of the core funding associated with each 15    in-state undergraduate student included in the eligible 16    public institution's head count; plus17        (2) 50% of the core funding associated with each 18    in-state undergraduate who is also an underrepresented 19    student included in the eligible public institution's head 20    count; plus21        (3) 50% of the core funding associated with each 22    in-state undergraduate student attending the eligible 23    public institution who is qualified by income for a grant 24    under the Monetary Award Program or the Federal Pell Grant 25    Program; plus  HB1581- 28 -LRB104 08166 LNS 18214 b1        (4) 10% of the core funding associated with each 2    in-state undergraduate student included in the eligible 3    public institution's head count who also attended a public 4    high school located in a school district placed into Tier 5    1 under Section 18-8.15 of the School Code; plus6        (5) 10% of the core funding associated with each 7    in-state undergraduate student included in the eligible 8    public institution's head count who also attended a public 9    high school located in a school district placed into Tier 10    2 under Section 18-8.15 of the School Code and who is also 11    low income; plus12        (6) 25% of the core funding associated with each 13    in-state undergraduate student included in the eligible 14    public institution's head count who is an adult student, 15    provided that in no event shall more than 100% of the 16    responsibility for covering the core funding associated 17    with any in-state undergraduate student included in an 18    eligible public institution's head count be apportioned to 19    State appropriations under this Section, irrespective of 20    how many apportionment adjustments may be applicable to 21    the student; plus22        (7) 25% of the core funding associated with each 23    in-state graduate student included in the eligible public 24    institution's head count, plus an additional 50% of the 25    core funding associated with each in-state graduate 26    student who is also an underrepresented student included   HB1581- 29 -LRB104 08166 LNS 18214 b1    in the eligible public institution's head count; plus 2        (8) 10% of the core funding associated with each 3    out-of-state undergraduate student included in the 4    eligible public institution's head count; plus5        (9) 25% of the core funding associated with each 6    out-of-state undergraduate student who is also an 7    underrepresented student included in the eligible public 8    institution's head count; plus9        (10) 25% of the core funding associated with each 10    in-state undergraduate student included in the eligible 11    public institution's head count who is low income, 12    provided that in no event shall more than 35% of the 13    responsibility for covering the core funding associated 14    with any out-of-state undergraduate student be apportioned 15    to State appropriations under this Section, irrespective 16    of how many apportionment adjustments may be applicable to 17    the student; plus18        (11) 5% of the core funding associated with each 19    out-of-state graduate student included in the eligible 20    public institution's head count; plus 21        (12) 25% of the core funding associated with each 22    out-of-state graduate student who is also an 23    underrepresented student included in the eligible public 24    institution's head count.25    "ESS index" means, for an eligible public institution, a 26percentage that is equal to 100% minus the deemed State   HB1581- 30 -LRB104 08166 LNS 18214 b1appropriation percentage applicable to the eligible public 2institution in the fiscal year, as determined in this Section. 3    (b) The resource profile shall be the sum of each eligible 4public institution's other resources, equitable student share, 5base funding minimum, and special operational funding as 6determined under this Act.7        (1) The other resources of an eligible public 8    institution shall be an amount that is equal to 4.2% of the 9    most recent 4-year average of the eligible public 10    institution's end-of-fiscal-year endowment value.11        (2) The equitable student share apportionments shall 12    be predicated on data that shows disparities among various 13    student subgroups in enrollment and retention at each 14    eligible public institution. In each academic year, the 15    equitable student share of an eligible public institution 16    shall be a dollar amount that is equal to the eligible 17    public institution's core funding multiplied by its ESS 18    index.19        (3) The base funding minimum shall be calculated under 20    subsection (b) of Section 35.21        (4) Special operational funding is funding for 22    scholarships and specific appropriations aimed at a 23    specific initiative, project, or center that is aligned 24    with one or more of the adequacy components.25            (A) For Fiscal Year 2026 and Fiscal Year 2027, the 26        following line-item State appropriations shall be   HB1581- 31 -LRB104 08166 LNS 18214 b1        included in the resource profile :2                (i) at Chicago State University, the Chicago 3            State University Education Improvement Fund and 4            the College of Pharmacy.5                (ii) at Eastern Illinois University, the 6            equity-based student achievement program, Grow 7            Your Own Teachers at Eastern Illinois University 8            scholarships, and scholarship appropriations.9                (iii) at Illinois State University, 10            scholarship appropriations.11                (iv) at Northern Illinois University, 12            scholarship appropriations.13                (iv) at Southern Illinois University, the 14            Daily Egyptian, the School of Pharmacy, and 15            scholarship appropriations.16                (vi) at the University of Illinois, labor and 17            employment relations, the Hispanic Center of 18            Excellence, the Dixon Springs Agricultural Center, 19            the Institute of Government and Public Affairs, 20            the College of Dentistry, the College of Pharmacy 21            in Rockford, and scholarship appropriations.22            (B) For Fiscal Year 2028 and each fiscal year 23        thereafter, the Board shall determine, based on the 24        recommendations of the Funding Formula Review Panel, 25        the special operational funding to be included in the 26        resource profile.   HB1581- 32 -LRB104 08166 LNS 18214 b1    (c) The resource profile may not include any of the 2following:3        (1) tuition and fee revenue;4        (2) revenue from State or federal financial aid; or5        (3) special operational funding as follows:6            (A) for Fiscal Year 2026 and Fiscal Year 2027, the 7        following line-item State appropriations may not be 8        included in the resource profile:9                (i) at Southern Illinois University, the 10            National Corn-to-Ethanol Research Center, 11            programming at Belleville, the Office of Community 12            Engagement, the Center for Rural Health and Social 13            Service Development, and the Simmons Cancer 14            Institute; and15                (ii) at the University of Illinois, the 16            Prairie Research Institute, the University of 17            Illinois Hospital, Illinois Heart Rescue, the 18            Illinois Innocence Project, the Climate Jobs 19            Institute, the Illinois Fire Service Institute, 20            emergency mosquito abatement, pet population 21            control, carbon dioxide capture technology, carbon 22            capture utilization and storage, and water reports 23            under the federal Advanced Research Projects 24            Agency.25            (B) for Fiscal Year 2028 and each fiscal year 26        thereafter, the Board shall determine, based on the   HB1581- 33 -LRB104 08166 LNS 18214 b1        recommendations of the Funding Formula Review Panel, 2        the special operational funding to be included in the 3        resource profile. 4    Section 35. Distribution of State appropriations for 5eligible public institutions. 6    (a) As used in this Section:7    "Guardrail percentage" means the percentage obtained by 8multiplying 50% by the lesser of either:9        (1) the annual inflation rate measured by the 10    Employment Cost Index (Midwest Economy) published by the 11    Bureau of Labor Statistics of the United States Department 12    of Labor for the 4-quarter period ending on December 31 of 13    the immediately preceding fiscal year, but not less than 14    0%; or15        (2) the percentage equal to (i) the total amount of 16    new State formula funding for the fiscal year, divided by 17    (ii) the total amount of annual formula funding for the 18    immediately preceding fiscal year. 19The dollar amount of new State formula funding in a fiscal year 20that remains after accounting for all guardrail distributions 21to be made in the fiscal year shall be referred to as the new 22State formula funding. 23    "New State formula funding" means, in a fiscal year, the 24dollar amount of State appropriations that exceeds the dollar 25amount of the annual formula funding appropriated for public   HB1581- 34 -LRB104 08166 LNS 18214 b1universities in the immediately preceding fiscal year.2    "Pro rata share" means an amount that is equal to the sum 3of (i) the amount of the guardrail distribution allocated to 4the eligible public institution for the fiscal year, as 5determined in subsection (e), plus (ii) the eligible public 6institution's adequacy gap formula distribution and dollar gap 7formula distribution for the fiscal year, as determined in 8paragraph (1) of subsection (f).9    (b) The base funding minimum for each eligible public 10institution shall be determined as follows:11        (1) For Fiscal Year 2026, the base funding minimum of 12    an eligible public institution shall be the sum of all 13    State appropriations made from the Education Assistance 14    Fund or the General Revenue Fund to the eligible public 15    institution to use as operating funds in the previous 16    fiscal year.17        (2) For Fiscal Year 2027 and each fiscal year 18    thereafter, the base funding minimum of an eligible public 19    institution shall be the dollar value of its base funding 20    minimum from the immediately preceding fiscal year, 21    increased by any new State formula funding the eligible 22    public institution received in the immediately preceding 23    fiscal year, provided that there was new State formula 24    funding appropriated in the immediately preceding fiscal 25    year. If there was no increase or decrease made to annual 26    formula funding in the immediately preceding fiscal year,   HB1581- 35 -LRB104 08166 LNS 18214 b1    then the dollar value of the base funding minimum for the 2    eligible public institution that pertained to the 3    immediately preceding fiscal year shall carry forward into 4    the next fiscal year. If there was a year-to-year 5    reduction in annual formula funding in the immediately 6    preceding fiscal year, then the base funding minimum for 7    the eligible public institution in the next succeeding 8    fiscal year shall be the State appropriations made to the 9    eligible public institution to meet its operational 10    expenses for the fiscal year.11    (c) To enhance the stability of long-term funding for 12public universities, to create predictability in funding, to 13enhance the capacity of public universities to prepare 14budgets, and to create a feasible pathway to fully fund the 15adequacy target of each public university within a reasonable 16period of time, in Fiscal Year 2026 and in each fiscal year 17thereafter, the State shall endeavor to increase the aggregate 18amount of annual formula funding by an amount that is at least 19$135,000,000 more than the aggregate annual formula funding 20appropriation made in the immediately preceding fiscal year, 21and that amount shall be designated as the minimum target 22increase. The minimum target increase shall be in addition to 23and not a replacement for any other appropriations the State 24makes to support either public universities or the students 25who attend public universities. 26    The first fiscal year occurring after the adequacy target   HB1581- 36 -LRB104 08166 LNS 18214 b1of every eligible public institution is fully funded, after 2accounting for inflation and enrollment changes, shall be the 3full funding date, and the minimum target increase shall be an 4amount equal to the annual formula funding amount for the 5fiscal year of the full funding date, increased on a 6cumulative basis by a percentage equal to the percentage 7increase, if any, in the Employment Cost Index (Midwest 8Economy) published by the Bureau of Labor Statistics of the 9United States Department of Labor for the 4-quarter period 10ending on December 31 of the fiscal year in which the full 11funding date occurs. Thereafter, the minimum target increase 12in a fiscal year shall be the annual formula funding amount for 13the immediately preceding fiscal year, increased by a 14percentage equal to the percentage increase, if any, in the 15Employment Cost Index (Midwest Economy) published by the 16Bureau of Labor Statistics of the United States Department of 17Labor for the 4-quarter period ending on December 31 of the 18immediately preceding fiscal year. 19    (d) In Fiscal Year 2026 and in each fiscal year thereafter 20in which the State appropriates new State formula funding, 21each public university shall receive an appropriation from the 22Board equal to the sum of its base funding minimum for the 23fiscal year, plus its pro rata share of new State formula 24funding for the fiscal year. A public university shall receive 25all funding on behalf of each eligible public institution that 26is part of that public university and then distribute that   HB1581- 37 -LRB104 08166 LNS 18214 b1funding to each eligible public institution.2    (e) In each fiscal year in which the State appropriates 3new State formula funding, a portion of the new State formula 4funding shall be set aside and used as the aggregate guardrail 5distribution that shall be made to all public universities in 6the fiscal year. The amount of the guardrail distribution a 7public university shall receive in an applicable fiscal year 8shall be equal to the dollar value of its base funding minimum 9for the fiscal year, multiplied by the guardrail percentage. 10    (f) In each fiscal year in which there is new State formula 11funding, 50% of the new State formula funding shall be 12calculated using the dollar gap formula for each eligible 13public institution, and the remaining 50% shall be calculated 14using the adequacy gap formula for each eligible public 15institution through the following calculations:16        (1) The portion of the new State formula funding to be 17    distributed under the dollar gap formula shall be 18    calculated for each eligible public institution as 19    follows: 20            (A) First, add the total dollar value of the 21        adequacy gap of all eligible public institutions for 22        the fiscal year, which shall be the total adequacy 23        gap. 24            (B) Second, divide the dollar value of the 25        adequacy gap of the eligible public institution by the 26        dollar value of the total adequacy gap, which shall be   HB1581- 38 -LRB104 08166 LNS 18214 b1        the gap percentage A. 2            (C) Third, multiply the eligible public 3        institution's gap percentage A times the amount 4        available for the dollar gap formula for the fiscal 5        year. 6            (D) The dollar value of the product obtained after 7        calculating subparagraph (C) of this paragraph (1) 8        shall be the dollar gap formula distribution for the 9        eligible public institution.10        (2) The portion of the new State formula funding to be 11    distributed under the adequacy gap formula shall be 12    calculated for each eligible public institution as 13    follows: 14            (A) First, add the percentage gaps of all eligible 15        public institutions for the fiscal year, which shall 16        be the total percentage gap. 17            (B) Second, divide the percentage gap of the 18        eligible public institution by the total percentage 19        gap, which shall be the gap percentage B.20            (C) Third, multiply the eligible public 21        institution's gap percentage B times the amount 22        available for the adequacy gap formula for the fiscal 23        year. 24            (D) The dollar value of the product obtained after 25        calculating subparagraph (C) of this paragraph (2) 26        shall be the adequacy gap formula distribution for the   HB1581- 39 -LRB104 08166 LNS 18214 b1        eligible public institution.2    (g) The reduction formula shall be used in a fiscal year in 3which the State reduces its overall appropriations to public 4universities relative to the previous fiscal year such that 5funds are insufficient to provide each public university with 6its base funding minimum. In each fiscal year in which there is 7a reduction in funds relative to the previous fiscal year, the 8funding reductions shall be borne by public universities using 9the reduction guardrail factor, which equals 25%, and the 10remaining 75% shall be borne by public universities using the 11scaled institutional ratio cut. The reduction formula shall be 12determined as follows:13        (1) A reduction shall be determined by multiplying the 14    amount of the reduction of funds relative to the previous 15    fiscal year by the reduction guardrail factor. This amount 16    is to be subtracted from the eligible public institutions' 17    base funding minimum, with each eligible public 18    institution absorbing the percentage of the amount that 19    corresponds to each eligible public institution's 20    percentage of the base funding minimum.21        (2) The balance of the remaining reduction in funds 22    shall be distributed to universities using the reduction 23    ratio formula determined as follows:24            (A) The reduction ratio formula shall be 25        calculated by dividing the cumulative statewide 26        adequacy gap percentage by each eligible public   HB1581- 40 -LRB104 08166 LNS 18214 b1        institution's adequacy gap percentage and multiplying 2        the result by the percentage decrease in the current 3        fiscal year's appropriation compared to the prior 4        fiscal year's appropriation. 5            (B) To complete the reduction calculation, each 6        eligible public institution's percentage of the cut 7        shall be proportionally scaled up or down to fit the 8        total amount of the reduced appropriations. The scaled 9        institutional ratio cut shall be scaled by: 10                (i) calculating the difference between the 11            statewide sum of institutional ratio cuts and the 12            statewide sum of the guardrail reduction;13                (ii) calculating the ratio of each 14            institutional ratio cut and the statewide sum of 15            institutional ratio cuts; and16                (iii) calculating the product of subdivisions 17            (i) and (ii) of this subparagraph (B) and 18            subtracting that amount from each institutional 19            ratio cut. 20            (C) Once the reduction calculation is complete, 21        each eligible public institution that is part of a 22        public university shall have its cuts aggregated into 23        a total cut for the public university. 24    Section 40. Accountability and transparency framework; 25reporting; committee.   HB1581- 41 -LRB104 08166 LNS 18214 b1    (a) The Board shall oversee an accountability and 2transparency framework for assessing the distribution and use 3of funds appropriated by the funding formula under Section 30 4and evaluating the funds' effects on institutional outcomes 5pertaining to student affordability, enrollment, persistence, 6and outcome metrics. 7    (b) The Board shall report annually to the General 8Assembly on the implementation of the funding formula as 9follows:10        (1) The report shall be posted publicly on the Board's 11    website by March 1 of each year and shall, at a minimum, 12    include all of the following:13            (A) an updated adequacy target for each eligible 14        public institution for the upcoming fiscal year, 15        calculated from the following:16                (i) the updated resource profile for each 17            eligible public institution; and18                (ii) the updated adequacy gap for each 19            eligible public institution; and20            (B) a description of the use of all resources 21        received by eligible public institutions through the 22        appropriations of the funding formula; and23            (C) a description of the status and year-over-year 24        progress of each eligible public institution on a 25        series of institutional spending, institutional 26        performance, and student support metrics described in   HB1581- 42 -LRB104 08166 LNS 18214 b1        this Section.2        (2) The Board, with advice of each public university, 3    shall specify a set of metrics and associated information 4    designated for evaluating institutional performance and 5    annually report on those metrics. These metrics shall 6    include both point-in-time and longitudinal measures of 7    institutional spending of any resources received from the 8    funding formula and institutional performance regarding 9    student affordability, student enrollment, student 10    retention, and student graduation. Each eligible public 11    institution shall provide the needed data to calculate the 12    set of metrics and related information annually to the 13    Board by December 31. The metrics and related information 14    and materials shall include all of the following 15    information: 16            (A) Prospective spending proposals through which 17        eligible public institutions delineate their projected 18        use of appropriations allocated through the funding 19        formula for the forthcoming fiscal year. These 20        expenditure plans shall be categorized according to 21        accounting spending classifications established by the 22        Board. 23            (B) Retrospective spending summaries through which 24        eligible public institutions disclose the expenditure 25        of all new appropriations received in the preceding 26        fiscal year. These expenditure reports shall be   HB1581- 43 -LRB104 08166 LNS 18214 b1        structured based on accounting spending categories 2        designated by the Board. 3            (C) Metrics measuring the institutional status and 4        year-over-year changes in students' tuition and fees, 5        net price, and expected share of expenses. Student 6        affordability data and data trends shall be 7        disaggregated by undergraduate and graduate students 8        with further disaggregation by the student equity 9        categories aligned with the equitable student share, 10        set forth in paragraph (2) of subsection (b) of 11        Section 30. 12            (D) Metrics measuring the institutional status and 13        year-over-year changes in student enrollment. 14        Enrollment data and data trends shall be disaggregated 15        by undergraduate and graduate students with further 16        disaggregation by the student groups who carry with 17        them equity adjustments, as set forth in subsections 18        (c) through (e) of Section 25. 19            (E) Metrics measuring the institutional status and 20        year-over-year changes in student retention increased 21        rates from one year of enrollment to the next, minus 22        those that transfer from one eligible public 23        institution to another, and minus those that receive a 24        credential and no longer enroll thereafter. Student 25        retention data and data trends shall be disaggregated 26        by the student groups who carry with them equity   HB1581- 44 -LRB104 08166 LNS 18214 b1        adjustments, as set forth in subsections (c) through 2        (e) of Section 25.3            (F) Metrics measuring student graduation rates 4        within 4 years, 5 years, and 6 years and 5        year-over-year changes in graduation rates. Graduation 6        data and data trends shall be disaggregated by the 7        student groups who carry with them equity adjustments, 8        as described in subsections (c) through (e) of Section 9        25. 10        (3) The Board shall identify at what point an adequacy 11    gap is sufficiently small, thereby signifying an eligible 12    public institution's capability to consistently advance 13    toward achieving State objectives, including, but not 14    limited to, institutional student affordability, 15    enrollment, persistence, completion, and outcomes. If an 16    eligible public institution's adequacy gap exceeds the 17    level determined by the Board, the eligible public 18    institution is exempt from the actions described in 19    paragraph (4) of subsection (e). 20    (c) For each of its metrics, the Board, with advice from 21eligible public institutions, shall determine goals for each 22eligible public institution in alignment with the funding 23formula. These goals shall include overall progress and status 24goals for the eligible public institution, as well as goals 25that close equity gaps between students who carry with them 26subsidies and the institutional average. The Board shall track   HB1581- 45 -LRB104 08166 LNS 18214 b1and report publicly on its website and in its annual written 2reports the progress of each eligible public institution 3toward those goals.4    (d) The Board may review data submitted by an eligible 5public institution to ensure that it is responsive to the 6requirements of this Act. If the Board determines that the 7data submitted is not responsive to the requirements of this 8Act or the Board's rules, the Board may require an eligible 9public institution to submit corrected data. 10        (1) If an eligible public institution does not comply 11    with data requests promptly, the Board may withhold any 12    funds appropriated to that eligible public institution 13    from the funding formula beyond the eligible public 14    institution's base funding minimum until the proper data 15    is submitted. 16        (2) If the Board determines that an eligible public 17    institution has reported revenue or expenditures in the 18    wrong category as set by the Board, the Board may 19    reclassify those revenues or expenditures.20    (e) To aid the Board in upholding the accountability and 21transparency framework and in reporting its findings in Fiscal 22Year 2026, the Executive Director of the Board shall establish 23an Accountability and Transparency Committee tasked with 24conducting pertinent technical evaluations of each eligible 25public institution's resource allocation and advancement in 26student affordability, enrollment, persistence, and outcome   HB1581- 46 -LRB104 08166 LNS 18214 b1metrics. The Accountability and Transparency Committee shall 2offer relevant and necessary technical expertise in 3facilitating the implementation of the accountability and 4transparency measures set forth in this Act, including, but 5not limited to, those in paragraph (4) of this subsection (e).6        (1) The Accountability and Transparency Committee 7    shall be composed of no more than 15 individuals and shall 8    consist of Board members, policymakers, and State and 9    national technical experts on higher education 10    accountability systems.11        Members of the Accountability and Transparency 12    Committee shall be appointed by the Executive Director of 13    the Board. The Accountability and Transparency Committee 14    shall include:15            (A) 4 members of the Board or their designees;16            (B) one member with expertise in closing 17        educational disparities and identifying and 18        implementing solutions that address historic 19        inequities in higher education;20            (C) one member with expertise in providing 21        research-based academic and student support that 22        prepares all students to achieve success in college 23        and a career;24            (D) 2 members with expertise in public university 25        budget and finance; and26            (E) one member with expertise in university   HB1581- 47 -LRB104 08166 LNS 18214 b1        management and performance.2        The Executive Director of the Board shall ensure that 3    the membership of the Accountability and Transparency 4    Committee includes representatives reflecting the 5    geographic, socioeconomic, racial, and ethnic diversity of 6    this State. Members shall be appointed to 4-year terms, 7    except that for the initial appointments, half of the 8    members shall be appointed to initial 2-year terms. 9    Members may be reappointed to the Accountability and 10    Transparency Committee, and all reappointments shall be 11    for 4-year terms.12        (2) Recommendations of the Accountability and 13    Transparency Committee shall be made based on a simple 14    majority vote of those Committee members present and 15    voting. A minority opinion may also accompany any 16    recommendation of the Accountability and Transparency 17    Committee. 18        (3) The Accountability and Transparency Committee 19    shall holistically assess progress on each of the Board's 20    metrics. The Accountability and Transparency Committee may 21    request an additional explanation or data from an eligible 22    public institution, which the Committee may consider in 23    determining if an eligible public institution has made 24    progress toward a goal. All considerations shall be 25    thoroughly documented and reported to the Board and the 26    public.  HB1581- 48 -LRB104 08166 LNS 18214 b1        (4) The Accountability and Transparency Committee may 2    request additional data from an eligible public 3    institution regarding spending and reporting if deemed 4    necessary. If the Accountability and Transparency 5    Committee determines that an eligible public institution 6    is failing to meet progress metrics despite being 7    adequately funded, the Accountability and Transparency 8    Committee shall advise the Board to implement the 9    following actions, including, but not limited to, 10    requiring that an eligible public institution:11            (A) develop a plan for ensuring adequate progress 12        based on the resources provided;13            (B) provide additional reporting on institutional 14        spending in alignment with the components of the 15        adequacy target;16            (C) provide additional reporting on the 17        institutional metrics set forth in this Section; and18            (D) permit closer oversight for spending by the 19        Board.20        If other actions under this paragraph (4) prove to be 21    unsuccessful, the Board may recommend restricting or 22    pausing access to additional funds until progress has been 23    made. 24        (5) The Board shall review its existing reporting 25    requirements to ensure that the required reporting from 26    each eligible public institution is not duplicative.   HB1581- 49 -LRB104 08166 LNS 18214 b1    Section 45. Funding Formula Review Panel. 2    (a) The Board shall establish a Funding Formula Review 3Panel tasked with studying and reviewing topics pertaining to 4the implementation and impact of the funding formula. The 5Panel shall provide recommendations and service to the 6Governor, the General Assembly, and the Board.7    (b) The Executive Director of the Board or the Executive 8Director's designee shall serve as a voting member and 9chairperson of the Funding Formula Review Panel. 10    (c) Members of the Funding Formula Review Panel shall be 11appointed by the Executive Director of the Board, except as 12otherwise provided in this Section. The Funding Formula Review 13Panel shall include representatives of public universities, 14faculty, students, families, advocacy organizations, and State 15government agencies, along with technical experts, and shall 16include: 17        (1) the Executive Director of the Board;18        (2) one member of the House of Representatives, 19    appointed by the Speaker of the House of Representatives; 20        (3) one member of the Senate, appointed by the 21    President of the Senate; 22        (4) one member of the House of Representatives, 23    appointed by the Minority Leader of the House of 24    Representatives; 25        (5) one member of the Senate, appointed by the   HB1581- 50 -LRB104 08166 LNS 18214 b1    Minority Leader of the Senate; 2        (6) one member appointed by the Governor;3        (7) 6 members from public universities, each appointed 4    to reflect the diversity of public universities; 5        (8) the Executive Director of the Illinois Student 6    Assistance Commission or the Executive Director's 7    designee; 8        (9) 2 members representing an organization that 9    advocates on behalf of public university faculty members 10    who are each employed by a different public university;11        (10) one member representing a statewide organization 12    that has specific expertise in research-based education 13    policy to support a healthy public education system that 14    prepares all students to achieve success in college, a 15    career, and civic life;16        (11) one member representing a higher education 17    advocacy organization focused on eliminating disparities 18    in college completion in this State for low-income and 19    first-generation college students and students of color; 20        (12) one member representing a statewide advocacy 21    organization focused on improving educational and 22    employment opportunities for women and adults;23        (13) one member representing a statewide organization 24    that has specific expertise in equity, justice, and 25    economic prosperity for the Latino community;26        (14) one member representing a statewide organization   HB1581- 51 -LRB104 08166 LNS 18214 b1    that has specific expertise in equity, justice, and 2    economic prosperity for the Black community;3        (15) 2 members with specific expertise in education 4    finance; and5        (16) 2 members representing an organization that has 6    specific expertise in amplifying young adult voices.7    The Executive Director shall ensure that the membership of 8the Funding Formula Review Panel includes representatives 9reflecting the geographic, socioeconomic, racial, and ethnic 10diversity of this State. 11    The Executive Director shall appoint a vice chairperson 12from the membership of the Funding Formula Review Panel.13    (d) Members shall be appointed for 4-year terms, except 14that for the initial appointments, half of the members shall 15be appointed to 2-year terms. Members may be reappointed to 16the Funding Formula Review Panel, and all reappointments shall 17be for 4-year terms.18    (e) Recommendations of the Funding Formula Review Panel 19shall be made based on a simple majority vote of those Panel 20members present and voting. A minority opinion may also 21accompany any recommendation of the Funding Formula Review 22Panel.23    The Funding Formula Review Panel shall study topics at the 24direction of the General Assembly, the Board of Higher 25Education, or the chairperson and shall recommend any funding 26formula recalibrations or changes to the Board, including, but   HB1581- 52 -LRB104 08166 LNS 18214 b1not limited to, all of the following:2        (1) special operational funding for inclusion in the 3    resource profile;4        (2) equitable student share;5        (3) the high-cost and high-priority program 6    adjustments;7        (4) the inclusion of graduate students throughout the 8    funding formula;9        (5) medical expenses; and10        (6) additional underserved students to be included in 11    the equity adjustments and equitable student share, 12    including, but not limited to, student parents, 13    undocumented students, English learners, and 14    first-generation students.15    (f) On an annual basis, the Funding Formula Review Panel 16shall validate the following per-student elements of the 17adequacy target on a cumulative basis by inflation computed 18using the Employment Cost Index (Midwest Economy) published by 19the Bureau of Labor Statistics of the United States Department 20of Labor for the 4-quarter period ending on December 31 of the 21fiscal year in which the full funding date occurs:22        (1) access support;23        (2) academic and nonacademic support;24        (3) core instructional program support;25        (4) research support;26        (5) public service and artistry support;  HB1581- 53 -LRB104 08166 LNS 18214 b1        (6) institutional support; and2        (7) physical plant support.3    (g) Once every 3 years, the Funding Formula Review Panel 4shall consider and make recommendations to the Board and 5General Assembly for recalibrating each of the following 6adjustments of the adequacy target, except for inflation 7adjustments under subsection (b) of Section 20, based on 8evidence-based practices, research, a study of average 9expenses, and the U.S. National Science Foundation's Higher 10Education Research and Development database and as reported in 11the Board's most recent revenue and expenditure reports:12        (1) the access adjustment;13        (2) the holistic support equity adjustment;14        (3) the concentration factor adjustment;15        (4) the core instructional program adjustment;16        (5) the diversity programs adjustment;17        (6) the research support adjustment;18        (7) the school size adjustment; and19        (8) the laboratory space adjustment.20    (h) Within 5 years after the implementation of this 21Section and every 5 years thereafter, the Funding Formula 22Review Panel shall conduct a comprehensive review on the 23functioning of the funding formula that is aligned as much as 24possible to the Board's strategic plan development timeline. 25The Funding Formula Review Panel shall report to the Board of 26Higher Education, the General Assembly, and the Governor on   HB1581- 54 -LRB104 08166 LNS 18214 b1the findings of the review. 2    Section 50. Board of Higher Education capacity. The 3Board's annual budget request shall describe any additional 4resources needed to support the implementation of the funding 5formula, the Funding Formula Review Panel, and the 6Accountability and Transparency Committee. The budget request 7shall include any relevant descriptions regarding how the 8Board is supporting the initial implementation of the funding 9formula, including establishing the necessary definitions, 10reviewing submitted eligible public institution data for 11accuracy and completeness, working with each eligible public 12institution to ensure the accuracy of reported data, 13determining whether each eligible public institution is 14complying with the requirements of this Act, and supporting 15each eligible public institution to improve the eligible 16public institution's performance. 17    Section 55. Data infrastructure.18    (a) The Board's annual budget request shall describe the 19resources needed to support the collection of data needed to 20implement and recommend recalibrations of the funding formula. 21If the Accountability and Transparency Committee or Funding 22Formula Review Panel recommends additional data capacity, the 23Board shall consider those recommendations in developing its 24annual budget request.  HB1581- 55 -LRB104 08166 LNS 18214 b1    (b) The Board shall develop guidelines for each eligible 2public institution receiving funds under the funding formula 3to submit data annually for inclusion in the funding formula. 4    Section 900. The Board of Higher Education Act is amended 5by changing Section 8 as follows: 6    (110 ILCS 205/8)  (from Ch. 144, par. 188)7    Sec. 8. The Board of Trustees of the University of 8Illinois, the Board of Trustees of Southern Illinois 9University, the Board of Trustees of Chicago State University, 10the Board of Trustees of Eastern Illinois University, the 11Board of Trustees of Governors State University, the Board of 12Trustees of Illinois State University, the Board of Trustees 13of Northeastern Illinois University, the Board of Trustees of 14Northern Illinois University, and the Board of Trustees of 15Western Illinois University shall submit to the Board not 16later than the 15th day of November of each year their its 17budget proposals for the operation and capital needs of the 18institutions under their its governance or supervision for the 19ensuing fiscal year. The Illinois Community College Board 20shall submit to the Board by December 15 of each year its 21budget proposal for the operation and capital needs of the 22institutions under its governance or supervision for the 23ensuing fiscal year. Each budget proposal shall conform to the 24procedures developed by the Board in the design of an   HB1581- 56 -LRB104 08166 LNS 18214 b1information system for State universities and colleges.2    In order to maintain a cohesive system of higher 3education, the Board and its staff shall communicate on a 4regular basis with all public university presidents. They 5shall meet at least semiannually to achieve economies of scale 6where possible and provide the most innovative and efficient 7programs and services.8    The Board, in the analysis of formulating the annual 9budget request, shall consider rates of tuition and fees and 10undergraduate tuition and fee waiver programs at public 11community the State universities and colleges. The Board shall 12also consider the current and projected utilization of the 13total physical plant of each campus of a public university or 14community college in approving the capital budget for any new 15building or facility.16    The Board of Higher Education shall submit to the 17Governor, to the General Assembly, and to the appropriate 18budget agencies of the Governor and General Assembly its 19analysis and recommendations on such budget proposals.20    The Board is directed to form a broad-based group of 21individuals representing the Office of the Governor, the 22General Assembly, public community colleges institutions of 23higher education, State agencies, business and industry, 24statewide organizations representing faculty and staff, and 25others as the Board shall deem appropriate to devise a system 26for allocating State resources to public community colleges   HB1581- 57 -LRB104 08166 LNS 18214 b1institutions of higher education based upon performance in 2achieving State goals related to student success and 3certificate and degree completion. 4    In each fiscal year Beginning in Fiscal Year 2013, the 5Board of Higher Education budget recommendations to the 6Governor and the General Assembly shall include allocations to 7public community colleges institutions of higher education 8based upon performance metrics designed to promote and measure 9student success in degree and certificate completion. Public 10university metrics must be adopted by the Board by rule, and 11public community college metrics must be adopted by the 12Illinois Community College Board by rule. These metrics must 13be developed and promulgated in accordance with the following 14principles:15        (1) The metrics must be developed in consultation with 16    public community colleges institutions of higher 17    education, as well as other State educational agencies and 18    other higher education organizations, associations, 19    interests, and stakeholders as deemed appropriate by the 20    Board.21        (2) The metrics shall include provisions for 22    recognizing the demands on and rewarding the performance 23    of community colleges institutions in advancing the 24    success of students who are academically or financially at 25    risk, including first-generation students, low-income 26    students, and students traditionally underrepresented in   HB1581- 58 -LRB104 08166 LNS 18214 b1    higher education, as specified in Section 9.16 of this 2    Act.3        (3) The metrics shall recognize and account for the 4    differentiated missions of community colleges institutions 5    and sectors of higher education.6        (4) The metrics shall focus on the fundamental goal of 7    increasing completion of college courses, certificates, 8    and degrees. Performance metrics shall recognize the 9    unique and broad mission of public community colleges 10    through consideration of additional factors, including, 11    but not limited to, enrollment, progress through key 12    academic milestones, transfer to a baccalaureate 13    institution, and degree completion.14        (5) The metrics must be designed to maintain the 15    quality of degrees, certificates, courses, and programs.16In devising performance metrics, the Board may be guided by 17the report of the Higher Education Finance Study Commission. 18    Each State university must submit its plan for capital 19improvements of non-instructional facilities to the Board for 20approval before final commitments are made if the total cost 21of the project as approved by the institution's board of 22control is in excess of $2 million. Non-instructional uses 23shall include, but not be limited to, dormitories, union 24buildings, field houses, stadium, other recreational 25facilities, and parking lots. The Board shall determine 26whether or not any project submitted for approval is   HB1581- 59 -LRB104 08166 LNS 18214 b1consistent with the strategic plan for higher education and 2with instructional buildings that are provided for therein. If 3the project is found by a majority of the Board not to be 4consistent, such capital improvement shall not be constructed.5(Source: P.A. 102-1046, eff. 6-7-22; 103-940, eff. 8-9-24; 6revised 8-23-24.) 7    Section 999. Effective date. This Act takes effect upon 8becoming law.